Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3639.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 12 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 11I the following section:-
Section 11I 1/4. (a) Every person who, under color of any law, statute, ordinance,
regulation, custom, or usage, subjects, or causes to be subjected, any person within the
jurisdiction of this commonwealth to the deprivation of any rights, privileges, or immunities
secured by the United States Constitution or the constitution of the commonwealth, shall be
liable to the party injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for
redress; provided, however, that in any action brought against a judicial officer for an act or
omission taken in the officer’s judicial capacity, injunctive relief shall not be granted unless a
declaratory decree was violated or declaratory relief was unavailable. For purposes of this
section, color of any law, statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage includes color of any
statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage, of the United States and of any state or territory
or the District of Columbia.
of 2

(b) An action brought under this section may be filed either in the superior court for the
county in which the conduct complained of occurred or in the superior court for the county in
which a person whose conduct complained of resides or has their place of business.
(c) A defendant in an action brought under this section may assert an immunity defense
only to the extent available to a person sued under section 1983 of title 42 of the United States
Code under like circumstances; provided, however, that this subsection shall not be construed to
waive or abrogate any defense of sovereign immunity otherwise available to a party. This
subsection does not alter, amend, create, or support a qualified or absolute immunity defense in
any other action or proceeding brought under any other provision of Massachusetts law.
(d) In any action or proceeding brought under this section, the court, in its discretion, may
award a prevailing plaintiff: (i) reasonable attorney’s fees and costs; provided, however, that in
any action brought against a judicial officer for an act or omission taken in the officer’s judicial
capacity and within the officer’s jurisdiction, the officer shall not be held liable for any fees or
costs; and (ii) expert fees.
(e) An action brought under this section shall be commenced not later than ten years after
the date the cause of action accrues.
(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its
application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can
be given effect without the invalid provision or application.
(g) This section shall apply retroactively to January 20, 2025.
of 2